Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-329
Conciliation agreement; breach; civil action authorized.

Whenever the commission has reasonable cause to believe that a respondent has breached a conciliation agreement, the commission shall refer the matter to the Attorney General for filing of a civil action under section 20-343 for the enforcement of such agreement.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 30.